Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1855.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325E.3162] POLITICAL POP-UP ADVERTISEMENTS AND MESSAGES. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, "political activity" means providing a name, contact information, electronic signature, or other identifying information for a software application or website to send a message or petition on behalf of the person to an appointed or elected official with the intent to influence the official's action. new text end new text begin (b) A person is prohibited from requiring a consumer to engage in political activity to access services through a software application or website. A software application or website that prompts a consumer to engage in political activity to access a service must provide a clear and conspicuous opt-out function that allows the consumer to continue to use the service without engaging in political activity. A term or condition for a software application or website that states that the consumer has agreed to engage in political activity to access a service is void and unenforceable. new text end